Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201748-735.01
Boiler Inspection Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Boiler Inspection Cash Fund is created. The commissioner shall use the fund for the administration of the boiler inspection program pursuant to the Boiler Inspection Act. The fund shall consist of money appropriated to it by the Legislature and fees collected in the administration of the act. Fees so collected shall be remitted to the State Treasurer with an itemized statement showing the source of collection. The State Treasurer shall credit the fees to the fund and the money in the fund shall not lapse into the General Fund, except that money in the Boiler Inspection Cash Fund may be transferred to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Boiler Inspection Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

The State Treasurer shall transfer one hundred fifty thousand dollars from the Boiler Inspection Cash Fund to the General Fund on or before June 15, 2018, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.

Laws 1995, LB 438, § 13;

Laws 2017, LB331, § 25.
May 16, 2017
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.